North Carolina, session 2025, SB724.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-917. Camping in public spaces.
(a) Purpose. – The purpose of this section is to protect the public from the dangers of
unauthorized street camping in public parks, rights-of-way, and other public spaces. The General
Assembly recognizes the risk presented by unauthorized street camping, including conduct that
results in the proliferation of drugs and drug paraphernalia, threats of random acts of violence,
and the spread of disease and detritus. It is the intention of the General Assembly to protect the
people of the State of North Carolina in public spaces and rights-of-way by enacting a prohibition
on unauthorized camping in public spaces.
(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Campsite. – Public grounds designated as a recreational camping ground, area,
or facility, that allows temporary overnight occupancy without a permanently
fixed structure.
(2) Public camping. – The act of sleeping upon, occupying, or otherwise using as
a substitute for regular shelter, any public property or right-of-way as
evidenced by, but not limited to, the erection of a tent or other temporary
shelter, the presence of bedding or pillows, or the storage of personal property.
(c) Prohibition. – It shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally or knowingly engage
in public camping in any location that is not designated as a campsite by the State or a county,
city, or other political subdivision of the State. This subsection does not apply to any public
property that has been designated by the State, county, city, or any other political subdivision
with jurisdiction over the property as a temporary site for unsheltered homeless encampments. A
violation of this subsection shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor; provided, however, for the first
offense, a violator shall not be charged with a misdemeanor but shall instead be directed to the
nearest emergency shelter for homeless individuals.
(d) Local government actions. – A county or municipality shall not do either of the
following:
(1) Authorize or otherwise allow any person to regularly engage in public
camping or sleeping on any public property that has not been designated as a
campsite by the State or a county, city, or other political subdivision with
jurisdiction over the area, including, but not limited to, any public building,
public grounds, or public rights-of-way. This subsection does not apply to any
*S724-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
property designated as a temporary site for unsheltered homeless
encampments.
(2) Prohibit or discourage law enforcement officers or prosecuting attorneys
under their employ from enforcing any ordinance or other regulation
prohibiting public camping, sleeping, or obstruction of sidewalks or other
rights-of-way within the jurisdictional limits of the county or municipality.
(e) Enforcement. – Any resident of a county or city, owner of a business located within
a county or city, or the Attorney General may bring a civil action in any court of competent
jurisdiction against any county or municipality to enjoin a violation of subsection (d) of this
section. If the resident or business owner prevails in the civil action, the court may award
reasonable expenses incurred in bringing the civil action, including court costs, attorneys' fees,
investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs. An application for an injunction under this
subsection shall be accompanied by an affidavit attesting to all of the following:
(1) The applicant has provided written notice of the alleged violation to the
governing body of the county or municipality.
(2) The applicant has provided the county or municipality with five business days
to cure the alleged violation.
(3) The county or municipality has failed to take all reasonable actions within its
powers to cure the alleged violation within 5 business days after receiving
written notice of the alleged violation from the applicant.
(f) No State funds shall be appropriated to a county or municipality for homelessness
assistance, prevention, or services if the county or municipality violates the provisions of this
section and fails to remedy the violation as required by this section."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 724-First Edition